test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xadabasj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - хадабась: # Verb 'to kill' /Type 7b - non-even syllable stem/ - partial paradigm
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: хадабидмʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хадабин
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хадаби
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: хадабиниʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: хадабидиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хадабихиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: хадабиваˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хадабидаˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хадабиˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадабив
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадабир
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадабида
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадабимиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадабириʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадабидиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадабиваˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадабираˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадабидоʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадабихиюн
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадабихиюд
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадабихиюда
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадабихиюниʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадабихиюдиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадабихиюдиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадабихиюнаˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадабихиюдаˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадабихиюдоʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадэбин
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадэбид
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадэбида
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадэбиниʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадэбидиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадэбидиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадэбинаˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадэбидаˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадэбидоʼ   
     
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: хадабидамзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: хадабинась
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хадабись
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: хадабининзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: хадабидинзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хадабихинзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: хадабиваць
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: хадабидаць
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хадабиць
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадабивась
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадабирась
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадабидась
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадабиминзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадабиринзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадабидинзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадабиваць
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадабираць
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадабидонзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадабихиюнась
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадабихиюдась
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадабихиюдась
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадабихиюнинзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадабихиюдинзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадабихиюдинзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадабихиюнаць
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадабихиюдаць
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадабихиюдонзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадабинась
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадабидась
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадабидась
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадабининзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадабидинзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадабидинзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадабинаць
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадабидаць
     хадабась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадабидонзь
     
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: хадабавэдмʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: хадабавэн
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: хадабавы
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: хадабавэниʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: хадабавэдиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: хадабавэхэʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: хадабавэваˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: хадабавэдаˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: хадабавыˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: хадабавэдамзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: хадабавэнась
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: [хадабавысь, хадабавэсь]
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: хадабавэнинзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: хадабавэдинзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: хадабавэхэнзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: хадабавэваць
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: хадабавэдаць
     хадабась+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: [хадабавыць, хадабавэць]
     хадабась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+Abs: хадабава
     хадабась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Nom+Abs: хадабаˮма
     хадабась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Nom+Abs: хадабада 
     хадабась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+Abs: хадабавы
     хадабась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Nom+Abs: [хадабавнда, хадабувнда]
     хадабась+V+TV+PrcNeg+Sg+Nom+Abs: [хадабавдавэй, хадабувдавэй]
     хадабась+V+TV+Ger: [хадаба, хадабась]
     хадабась+V+TV+GerFin: хадабаванзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Subord+Abs: хадабабˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Evas+Abs: хадабавоӈгад     
     хадабась+V+TV+ConNeg: хадабюˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+ConNeg: хадабаӈгуˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: хадабаӈгудмʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хадабаӈгун
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хадабаӈгу
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: хадабаӈгуниʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: хадабаӈгудиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хадабаӈгухуʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: хадабаӈгуваˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хадабаӈгудаˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хадабаӈгуˮ 
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: хадабаӈгудамзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: хадабаӈгунась
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хадабаӈгусь
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: хадабаӈгунинзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: хадабаӈгудинзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хадабаӈгухунзь
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: хадабаӈгуваць
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: хадабаӈгудаць
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хадабаӈгуць 
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: хадабаӈгув
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: хадабаӈгур
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: хадабаӈгуда
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: хадабаӈгумиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: хадабаӈгуриʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: хадабаӈгудиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: хадабаӈгуваˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: хадабаӈгураˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: хадабаӈгудоʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: хадабаӈгухуюн
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: хадабаӈгухуюд
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: хадабаӈгухуюда
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: хадабаӈгухуюниʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: хадабаӈгухуюдиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: хадабаӈгухуюдиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: хадабаӈгухуюнаˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: хадабаӈгухуюдаˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: хадабаӈгухуюдоʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: хадабаӈгун
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: хадабаӈгуд
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: хадабаӈгуда
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: хадабаӈгуниʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: хадабаӈгудиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: хадабаӈгудиʼ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: хадабаӈгунаˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: хадабаӈгудаˮ
     хадабась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: хадабаӈгудоʼ  
